Florida, session 2026, HB4077.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Short title.—This act may be cited as the
"Punta Gorda Utility District Boundary Codification and Utility
Transfer Act."
Section 2. Legislative intent.—The Legislature finds that:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4077-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 4077 2026
(1) The boundaries of the Punta Gorda Utility District
must be established.
(2) The district is wholly located within the corporate
boundaries of Charlotte County, which provides potable water and
wastewater utility services.
(3) The public interest is best served by authorizing the
county to provide potable water and wastewater utility services
for certain uncertificated lands lying outside the district,
which will ensure uninterrupted service and efficient regional
utility management.
Section 3. Establishment of district boundaries.—
(1) The boundaries of the Punta Gorda Utility District are
hereby codified to include all lands lying within the corporate
limits of the City of Punta Gorda, Charlotte County, as such
municipal boundaries exist on the effective date of this act.
(2) The City of Punta Gorda shall provide the Department
of State and the Department of Commerce a certified map and
metes and bounds legal description of the city's municipal
boundaries as of the effective date of this act. This map and
description are incorporated by reference and constitute the
official boundaries of the district.
Section 4. Provision of potable water and wastewater
utility services.—
(1) Notwithstanding any interlocal agreement to the
contrary, Charlotte County is authorized to assume
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4077-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 4077 2026
responsibility for potable water and wastewater utility service,
operations, billing, management, and associated assets and
obligations for utility functions located in certain lands lying
outside the district upon this act becoming a law. The City of
Punta Gorda may continue to own and maintain current assets
outside of the district as necessary to provide continuity of
service for the city's customers.
(2) The City of Punta Gorda and Charlotte County shall
enter into one or more interlocal agreements as necessary to
effectuate the assumption described in subsection (1). The first
interlocal agreement shall be entered into no later than 180
days after the date upon which this act becomes a law. The
initial interlocal agreement shall memorialize the steps needed
to develop the fully executable transition plan as described in
subsection (3).
(3) The City of Punta Gorda and Charlotte County shall
provide a written report, either jointly or separately, to the
Charlotte County legislative delegation no later than 365 days
after the date upon which this act becomes a law. The report or
reports shall describe the fully executable transition plans for
potable water and wastewater utility service, funding plan,
operations, billing, management, and associated assets and
obligations for utility functions located in certain lands lying
outside the district.
(4) Until the assumption described in subsection (2) is
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4077-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 4077 2026
finalized pursuant to one or more interlocal agreements, the
City of Punta Gorda shall continue to provide potable water and
wastewater utility service to existing and new customers and, as
owner, must maintain its potable water and wastewater utility
infrastructure for so long as is necessary to provide continuity
of service.
(5) Nothing in this act shall prohibit the City of Punta
Gorda and Charlotte County from addressing related or necessary
matters as interlocal provisions.
Section 5. Construction; transitional powers, duties, and
obligations.—
(1) Nothing in this act shall be construed to impair,
alter, or invalidate any existing bonds, capital improvement
commitments, franchise agreements, interlocal agreements, or
financial obligations of the district, the City of Punta Gorda,
or Charlotte County.
(2) All powers, duties, and obligations of the Punta Gorda
Utility District and the City of Punta Gorda shall continue
until such powers are lawfully transferred under section 4 of
this act.
Section 6. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4077-01-c1